Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.760

End of participation in judicial retirement account plan—Newly elected or appointed judges or justices.

(1) Beginning January 1, 2007, any newly elected or appointed supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge shall not participate in the judicial retirement account plan under chapter 2.14 RCW and shall be subject to the benefit and contribution provisions under chapter 189, Laws of 2006.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2007, any newly elected or appointed supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge, who has not previously established membership in this system, shall become a member of plan 2 and shall be subject to the benefit and contribution provisions under chapter 189, Laws of 2006.

[ 2006 c 189 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 189: See note following RCW 2.14.115.